Rhode Island statutes. Title 3 Alcoholic Beverages
Chapter 7 Retail Licenses

3-7-1.
Class A license — Towns and cities of less than 10,000.

In cities and towns having a population of less than ten thousand (10,000) inhabitants, a retailer’s Class A license authorizes the holder to keep for sale and to sell at the place described beverages at retail and to deliver the beverages in a sealed package or container, which package or container shall not be opened nor its contents consumed on the premises where sold. The sale of any quantity of beverages to a nonlicense holder constitutes a sale at retail. These provisions shall not be construed to limit the powers of the department of business regulation to issue licenses on condition, nor to make rules and regulations as provided. The annual fee for the license is four hundred dollars ($400) prorated to the year ending December 1 of every calendar year.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 5; P.L. 1934, ch. 2088, § 2; P.L. 1935, ch. 2270, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 163, § 3, impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 120; G.L. 1956, §

3-7-1

.

3-7-2.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 5; P.L. 1934 (S.S.), ch. 2173, § 1; P.L. 1934 (S.S.), ch. 2174, § 1; P.L. 1935, ch. 2270, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 163, § 3; P.L. 1939, ch. 659, § 2; P.L. 1942, ch. 1212, art. 12, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 1976, ch. 251, § 1.

3-7-3.
Class A license — Towns and cities of 10,000 or more.

In cities and towns having a population of ten thousand (10,000) or more inhabitants, a retailer’s Class A license authorizes the holder to keep for sale and to sell, at the place described, beverages at retail and to deliver the beverages in a sealed package or container, which package or container shall not be opened nor its contents consumed on the premises where sold. The holder of a Class A license, if other than a person entitled to retail, compound, and dispense medicines and poisons, shall not on the licensed premises engage in any other business, keep for sale or sell any goods, wares, merchandise or any other article or thing except the beverages authorized under this license and nonalcoholic beverages. This provision shall not apply to the sale or selling of cigarettes, newspapers, cigars, cigarette lighters, gift bags, prepackaged peanuts, pretzels, chips, olives, onions, cherries, hot stuffed cherry peppers, Slim Jims and similar pre-packaged dried meat products, pickled eggs, popcorn, pre-packaged candy, styrofoam cooler, lemons, limes, and ice, nor to home bar accessories such as pourers, glasses, cork screws, stirrers, flasks, jiggers, wine racks, ice crushers, bottle openers, can openers and any other items of like nature which may, by suitable regulation of the director of business regulation, be authorized to be sold. A holder of a Class A license will not be prohibited from providing ATM machines to the general public for use on its licensed premises. This section shall not apply to promotional free goods which are subject to approval by the director. In the city of Newport this license may be issued to any person, firm or corporation who are owners of bona fide markets for the sale of alcoholic beverages in conjunction with and in addition to the sale of meats or groceries in those bona fide markets. A person, firm or corporation in that city may obtain a limited Class A license to sell beer, lager and ale on the same premises as other goods, wares, merchandise and articles are sold. No Class A license is granted for any premises unless the premises constitute a separate store, the entrance or entrances to which shall be exclusively from the street or streets or arcade. This provision shall not apply to any person, firm or corporation in the city of Newport who are owners of bona fide markets for the sale of alcoholic beverages in conjunction with and in addition to the sale of meats or groceries in those bona fide markets and as long as the market is owned and operated by the mother, father, son, daughter, brother or sister of the original licensee, but not otherwise.

The premises shall have opaque walls which shall completely partition and sever the premises from any adjoining market, concession or business. This provision shall not be construed to limit the powers of the department to issue licenses on condition nor to make rules and regulations as provided. The annual fee for a Class A license is five hundred dollars ($500) to one thousand dollars ($1,000) prorated to the year ending December 1st in every calendar year.

Any licenses issued under the provisions of this section prior to May 8, 1964 remains in full force and effect.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 5B; P.L. 1936, ch. 2338, § 1; P.L. 1937, ch. 2522, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 163, § 3; P.L. 1939, ch. 728, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

3-7-3

; P.L. 1962, ch. 252, § 1; P.L. 1963, ch. 149, § 1; P.L. 1964, ch. 234, § 1; P.L. 1969, ch. 247, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 364, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 139, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 249, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 313, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 376, art. 7, § 11; P.L. 2004, ch. 237, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 410, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 416, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 624, § 1.

3-7-3.1.
Class AT license.

One retailer’s Class AT license may be issued within the state, by the local licensing authority of the city of Warwick to one person. This person shall be a lessee of retail space at the state airport found within the city of Warwick and this license authorizes the holder to keep for sale and to sell at retail, at the place described, beverages produced in this state and to deliver the beverages at room temperature in a sealed package or container, which package or container shall not be opened nor its contents consumed on the premises where sold. The person to whom the license is issued shall pay to the city of Warwick an annual fee of one hundred dollars ($100) for the license. The license expires one year from its date. No further license shall be required or tax levied by the city for the privilege of selling these beverages pursuant to a license issued under this section. The license is limited to the same days and hours of operation as the holder of a Class A license within the city of Warwick.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 147, § 1.

3-7-4.
Proximity of Class A licenses.

Retailer’s Class A licenses under this chapter shall not be issued to authorize the sale of beverages in any store or place within two hundred feet (200´) measured by any public way of another premises holding a Class A license. Licenses presently issued to premises within two hundred feet (200´) of the premises where another Class A license is presently issued, may continue to be issued to those premises so long as those premises are in continuous operation under the license. Any transfer or removal from those premises of the license is subject to the provisions of this section. Where a proposed licensed place is upon the opposite side of the street from an existing license, the width of the street is to be disregarded in measuring the distance so as to ascertain if it is two hundred feet (200´) away from the premises.

In the event that the building or land occupied by the holder of a retailer’s Class A license is taken in whole or in part by eminent domain or by other public authority, the board, body or official who issued the license may permit the license to be transferred to a store or place no closer than one hundred fifty feet (150´) measured by any public way of other premises holding a Class A license. A retailer’s Class A license may be issued to the premises so long as the premises are in continuous operation under the license. Where a proposed licensed place is upon the opposite side of the street from an existing license, the width of the street is to be disregarded in measuring the distance to ascertain if it is one hundred fifty feet (150´) away from those premises.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 21; P.L. 1936, ch. 2338, § 4; P.L. 1937, ch. 2522, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 163, § 7; P.L. 1941, ch. 1038, § 1; P.L. 1946, ch. 1708, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

3-7-4

; P.L. 1964, ch. 231, § 2; P.L. 1965, ch. 130, § 1.

3-7-4.1.
Holders of retail Class A licenses permitted to conduct wine, beer, and distilled spirit samplings inside licensed premises.

Any holder of a Class A retail license shall be permitted to conduct at no charge to the consumer, inside the premises of the licensee, sample tastings of wine (under 13% alcohol by volume), beer (under 5.5% alcohol by volume), and distilled spirits available for purchase from the licensee’s outlet. These samples shall not exceed one-ounce servings of each wine, the number of wines being limited to no more than four (4) products at any one tasting; and one-ounce servings of each beer, with the number of beer samplings being limited to two (2) products at any one tasting; and one-quarter-ounce servings (1/4 oz.) of each distilled spirit, the number of distilled spirits being limited to no more than two (2) products at any one tasting. Furthermore, wine, beer, and distilled spirits samplings may not be conducted simultaneously on the same Class A licensed premise. Each consumer shall be limited to no more than one sample tasting of each product. The licensee may elect, once during the month of March, and once during the month of November only, to serve unlimited samples of wine products available for purchase from the licensee’s outlet.

It shall be required that the licensee provide, at no charge to the consumer, food samplings to be included with the tasting of all wine and beer. Those food samplings not consumed during the tasting shall not thereafter be offered for sale.

The licensee shall control, without wholesaler or supplier participation, the dispensing of all samples to prospective customers. The licensee may not hold more than ten (10) tasting events in any thirty-day (30) period. It shall be required that the licensee provide to the dispenser(s) of said wine and beer samples, training in the service of alcoholic beverages by a recognized training provider of alcoholic beverage service.

Sampling events may not be promoted except on the licensed premises. It shall be unlawful for any wholesaler, manufacturer, supplier, or any other person or entity to participate or provide anything or any service of value on account of or in conjunction with any such sampling. It shall be unlawful for any tasting, or combination of tastings, to exceed more than four (4) hours from start to finish and must be conducted during the normal hours of business.

History of Section.

P.L. 2003, ch. 224, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 384, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 367, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 467, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 460, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 466, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 20, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 22, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 177, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 384, § 1.

3-7-5.
Class A license issued to Class E licensee.

It is permissible for the holder of a retailer’s Class E license to hold a retailer’s Class A license. No Class A license shall be granted to a holder of a Class E license unless the holder of a Class E license maintains, operates, manages, or conducts a drugstore. The drugstore shall be operated as a self-contained and independent establishment and shall not be located in, or be operated as, a part of any market, department store, or hardware store. For a Class A license as described, the holder of a Class E license shall pay the regular annual license fee and have the full privilege of a Class A license. Provided, however, the licensing authority for the city of Providence may relieve the holder of a Class E license from the requirement to maintain, operate, manage, or conduct a drugstore as a condition of the continued holding of a Class A license, issued to or renewed by said licensee.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 5; P.L. 1934, ch. 2088, § 2; P.L. 1935, ch. 2270, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 163, § 3; P.L. 1949, ch. 2373, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

3-7-5

; P.L. 2014, ch. 17, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 18, § 1.

3-7-6.
Renewal of Class A, Class B, Class C, Class D, Class E, and Class J licenses.

The holder of a Class A, Class B, Class C, Class D, Class E, or Class J license who applies before October 1 in any licensing period for a license of the same class for the next succeeding licensing period is prima facie entitled to renewal to the extent that the license is issuable under §

3-5-16

. This application may be rejected for cause, subject to appeal as provided in §

3-7-21

. A person whose application has been rejected by the local licensing authorities shall, for the purpose of license quotas under §

3-5-16

, be deemed to have been granted a license until the period for an appeal has expired or until his or her appeal has been dismissed. The license holder may be required to pay a twenty-five dollar ($25.00) fee upon application of renewal, at the option of local licensing authorities. This fee shall be used by the local licensing authority for advertising and administrative costs related to processing the renewal application.

History of Section.

G.L., ch. 164, § 10; P.L. 1941, ch. 1038, § 3; P.L. 1961, ch. 164, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 240, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 178, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 274, § 1.

3-7-6.1.
Renewal of Class B, Class C, Class D, Class J, Class N and Class P licenses.

The holder of a Class B, Class C, Class D, Class J, Class N or Class P license who applies before October 1, in any licensing period, for a license of the same class for the next succeeding licensing period shall, prior to filing said application, demonstrate that he or she has complied with the alcohol server training regulations, as promulgated by the department of business regulation, as set forth in subsection (b) of this section.

The department of business regulation shall promulgate rules and regulations requiring that all licenses issued pursuant to this section meet the following minimum alcohol server training regulations, requirements:

All persons who sell or serve alcoholic beverages; anyone serving in a supervisory capacity over those who sell or serve alcoholic beverages; anyone whose job description entails the checking of identification for the purchase of alcoholic beverages; and valet parking staff shall receive alcohol server training regulations, as set forth herein;

Any eligible employee of a licensee shall be required to complete certified training within sixty (60) days of the commencement of his or her employment and must attain a minimum score of seventy-five percent (75%). Provided, however, that the city of Pawtucket and the town of Smithfield may require eligible employees to complete the certified training program, prior to employment within the city or town. Individuals certified by an alcohol server training program prior to December 31, 2005, are exempt from the certification requirements herein, not to exceed three (3) years;

Licensees shall require servers to be recertified every three (3) years;

As a condition of license renewal, and as part of the license renewal application, each licensee must submit to their municipality information verifying that all persons listed under subsection (b)(1) of this section and employed by the licensee for more than sixty (60) days in the past year have completed a certified program within the last three (3) years;

All persons identified under subsection (b) of this section must have their valid server permits on the premises when engaged in the sale or service of alcoholic beverages; and

Individuals who have been issued a server permit in another jurisdiction by an approved Rhode Island alcohol server training program shall be determined to be in compliance with this section subject to the three-year (3) limitation contained herein.

Only alcohol server training programs that meet the following criteria as determined by the department of business regulation may be eligible for certification:

Training is provided in all basic information relevant to servers, including, but not limited to:

The physiological effects of alcohol;

Alcohol’s association with social problems;

Coverage of legal requirements related to alcohol service;

How to identify patrons who are impaired; and

Techniques in refusing service to intoxicated patrons.

Training is provided in more than one medium including, but not limited to, video, training manual, and/or role playing related to refusal of service to intoxicated drinkers;

Training in preventing sales to underage drinkers, including training in detection of fraudulent identification; and

Training shall entail no less than two (2) hours, and no greater than four (4) hours in duration, with no absentee certification.

Notwithstanding the criteria established under subsection (c) of this section, an internet- or computer-based alcohol server training program shall be eligible for certification if the following criteria are met:

Training in all basic information, as outlined in subsection (c)(1) of this section, is included in the program;

Training in preventing sales to underage drinkers, including training in detection of fraudulent identification, is included in the program; and

Training program is designed to periodically verify that a trainee has reviewed and obtained a working knowledge of information presented through the internet or computer training program.

Testing procedures, test content, and grading procedures shall be approved by the department of business regulation to ensure testing integrity and consistency with program requirements contained in subsection (c) herein. The department of business regulation is authorized to audit, in a method it shall determine, any approved server training program;

Training programs, pursuant to rules and regulations promulgated by the department of business regulation, shall be recertified every three (3) years; and

Server permits shall be issued by the server training programs in a form approved by the department of business regulation. Said permits shall include, at a minimum, the name of the server, the date of issuance, and the name of the server training program.

The department of business regulation shall promulgate and enforce rules and regulations for noncompliance as follows:

Graduated penalties for licensees for violations within a three-year (3) period beginning with an initial written warning for violations within a three-year (3) period for a first violation; a written warning for a second violation; a fine not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for a third violation or noncompliance; and a license suspension for subsequent violations;

For violations within a three-year (3) period, graduated penalties for training programs beginning with an initial written warning, a written warning for a second (2nd) violation, and a suspension and/or decertification for a third (3rd) violation or for repeated noncompliance;

For violations within a three-year (3) period, graduated penalties for servers beginning with an initial written warning; a written warning for a second violation, and a loss of server training certification for a third violation or noncompliance; and

Failure to have a valid server permit on their person shall not constitute a violation, provided, proof of a valid permit is provided within ten (10) days thereof.

In order to provide for uniformity, any enactment by any government body relating to alcohol server training programs pertaining to Class B, Class C, Class D, Class J, Class N, and Class P licenses, as provided for herein shall be by statute as enacted by the general assembly.

The respective departments shall promulgate said regulations no later than October 1, 2005. The department of business regulation shall review and certify eligible alcohol server training programs no later than January 1, 2006. The department of business regulation shall notify applicants of any deficiencies not later than December 1, 2005. All licensees shall be in compliance with said regulations within ninety (90) days of January 1, 2006, or be subject to the penalties set forth herein.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 187, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 272, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 6, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 87, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 183, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 215, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 379, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 385, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 386, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 392, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 310, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 315, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 256, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 280, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 43, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 63, § 1.

3-7-7.
Class B license. [Effective until December 1, 2022.]

A retailer’s Class B license is issued only to a licensed bona fide tavern keeper or victualer whose tavern or victualing house may be open for business and regularly patronized at least from nine o’clock (9:00) a.m. to seven o’clock (7:00) p.m. provided no beverage is sold or served after one o’clock (1:00) a.m., nor before six o’clock (6:00) a.m. Local licensing boards may fix an earlier closing time within their jurisdiction, at their discretion. The East Greenwich town council may, in its discretion, issue full and limited Class B licenses which may not be transferred, but which shall revert to the town of East Greenwich if not renewed by the holder. The Cumberland town council may, in its discretion, issue full and limited Class B licenses which may not be transferred to another person or entity, or to another location, but which shall revert to the town of Cumberland if not renewed by the holder.

The license authorizes the holder to keep for sale and sell beverages including beer in cans, at retail at the place described and to deliver them for consumption on the premises or place where sold, but only at tables or a lunch bar where food is served. It also authorizes the charging of a cover, minimum, or door charge. The amount of the cover, or minimum, or door charge shall be posted at the entrance of the establishments in a prominent place.

A holder of a Class B license will be permitted to sell, with take-out food orders, up to two (2) seven hundred fifty millimeter (750 ml) bottles of wine or the equivalent volume of wine in smaller factory sealed containers, or seventy-two ounces (72 oz.) of mixed wine-based drinks or single-serving wine in containers sealed in such a way as to prevent re-opening without obvious evidence that the seal was removed or broken, one hundred forty-four ounces (144 oz.) of beer or mixed beverages in original factory sealed containers, and one hundred forty-four ounces (144 oz.) of draft beer or seventy-two ounces (72 oz.) of mixed beverages containing not more than nine ounces (9 oz.) of distilled spirits in growlers, bottles, or other containers sealed in such a way as to prevent re-opening without obvious evidence that the seal was removed or broken, provided such sales shall be made in accordance with § 1.4.10 of the department of business regulation (DBR) liquor control administration regulations,

230-RICR-30-10-1

, and any other DBR regulations. A Class B license holder shall not sell alcoholic beverages under the provisions of this subsection for a lower price than what is charged for the same beverage for consumption on the premises.

Delivery of alcoholic beverages with food from a Class B licensee is prohibited.

The provisions of subsections (a)(2)(i) and (a)(2)(ii) of this section shall remain permanent and any sunset provision pursuant to P.L. 2021, ch. 129, § 3 or P.L. 2021, ch. 130, § 3 shall be void.

Holders of licenses are not permitted to hold dances within the licensed premises, unless proper permits have been properly obtained from the local licensing authorities.

Any holder of a Class B license may, upon the approval of the local licensing board and for the additional payment of two hundred dollars ($200) to five hundred dollars ($500), open for business at twelve o’clock (12:00) p.m. and on Fridays and Saturdays and the night before legal state holidays may close at two o’clock (2:00) a.m. All requests for a two o’clock (2:00) a.m. license shall be advertised by the local licensing board in a newspaper having a circulation in the county where the establishment applying for the license is located.

A holder of a retailer’s Class B license is allowed to erect signs advertising his or her business and products sold on the premises, including neon signs, and is allowed to light those signs during all lawful business hours, including Sundays and holidays.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) and/or §

3-7-16.4

, a holder of a retail class B and/or class ED license may apply to the municipality in which the licensee is located for a permit to conduct a so-called “Lock-In Event”, under the following conditions:

A “Lock-In Event” is defined as an event where a specified group of individuals are permitted to remain in a licensed premises after closing hours including, but not limited to, the hours of 1:00 a.m. to 6:00 a.m.

A Lock-In Event must have the approval of the municipal licensing authority pursuant to a permit issued for each such event, subject to such conditions as may attach to the permit. The fee for the permit shall be not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100). The granting or denial of a Lock-In Event permit shall be in the sole discretion of the municipal licensing authority and there shall be no appeal from the denial of such a permit.

During the entire period of any Lock-In Event, all alcoholic beverages must be secured in place or removed from the public portion of the premises and secured to the satisfaction of the municipality issuing the Lock-In Event permit.

During the Lock-In Event, the establishment shall be exclusively occupied by the Lock-In Event participants and no other patrons shall be admitted to the premises who are not participants. It shall be a condition of the permit that participants shall not be admitted more than thirty (30) minutes after the permitted start time of the Lock-In Event, except in the event of unforeseen travel delays, nor permitted to re-enter the event if they leave the licensed premises.

As part of the Lock-In Event, food shall be served.

The municipal licensing authority may, in its sole discretion, require the presence of a police detail, for some or all of the event, and the number of officers required, if any, shall be determined by the municipality as part of the process of issuing the Lock-In Event permit. The licensee shall be solely responsible for the cost of any such required police detail.

The Pawtucket city council may, in its discretion, issue full and limited Class B licenses which may not be transferred to another person or entity, or to another location, but which shall revert to the city of Pawtucket if not renewed by the holder. This legislation shall not affect any Class B license holders whose licenses were issued by the Pawtucket city council with the right to transfer.

The annual license fee for a tavern keeper shall be four hundred dollars ($400) to two thousand dollars ($2,000), and for a victualer the license fee shall be four hundred dollars ($400) to two thousand dollars ($2,000). In towns with a population of less than two thousand five hundred (2,500) inhabitants, as determined by the last census taken under the authority of the United States or the state, the fee for each retailer’s Class B license shall be determined by the town council, but shall in no case be less than three hundred dollars ($300) annually. If the applicant requests it in his or her application, any retailer’s Class B license may be issued limiting the sale of beverages on the licensed premises to malt and vinous beverages containing not more than twenty percent (20%) alcohol by volume, and the fee for that limited Class B license shall be two hundred dollars ($200) to one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) annually. The fee for any Class B license shall in each case be prorated to the year ending December 1 in every calendar year.

Upon the approval and designation of a district or districts within its city or town by the local licensing board, the local licensing board may issue to any holder of a Class B license or a Class ED license, an extended hours permit to extend closing hours on Thursdays, Fridays and Saturdays, the night before a legal state holiday or such other days as determined by the local board, for one hour past such license holder’s legal closing time as established by the license holder’s license or licenses including, but not limited to, those issued pursuant to subsection (a)(4) of this section. The extended hours permit shall not permit the sale of alcohol during the extended one-hour period and shall prohibit the admittance of new patrons in the establishment during the extended one-hour period. The designation of such district(s) shall be for a duration of not less than six (6) months. Prior to designating any such district, the local licensing authority shall hold a hearing on the proposed designation. The proposed designation shall include the boundaries of the proposed district, the applicable days for the extended hours, and the duration of the designation and the conditions imposed. The proposed designation shall be advertised at least once per week for three (3) weeks prior to the hearing in a newspaper in general circulation in the city or town. The city or town will establish an application process for an extended hours permit for such license holder and may adopt rules and regulations to administer the permit.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 5; P.L. 1934, ch. 2088, § 2; P.L. 1935, ch. 2270, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 163, § 3; P.L. 1939, ch. 659, § 2; P.L. 1940, ch. 814, § 1; P.L. 1941, ch. 1037, § 1; P.L. 1970, ch. 197, § 1; P.L. 1971, ch. 153, § 1; P.L. 1975, ch. 71, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 22, § 1; P.L. 1977, ch. 225, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 338, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 408, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 257, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 244, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 301, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 376, art. 7, § 11; P.L. 2004, ch. 237, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 410, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 17, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 82, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 269, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 318, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 357, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 158, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 171, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 129, § 1, effective July 2, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 130, § 1, effective July 2, 2021; P.L. 2022, ch. 3, § 2, effective February 16, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 4, § 2, effective February 16, 2022.